Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF787.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: DIVISION I TEACHER SALARY SUPPLEMENT DISTRICT COST PER PUPIL Section 1. Section 257.10, subsection 9, paragraph a, subparagraph (3), subparagraph divisions (b) and (c), Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: (b) The department of management shall categorize all school districts into not more than ten tiers according to each school districtâs actual enrollment. Each tier established by the department of management containing a school district with an actual enrollment above three thousand five hundred pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number of school districts as other tiers containing school districts with an actual enrollment of more than three thousand five hundred pupils. Each tier established by the department of management containing a school district with an actual House File 787, p. 2 enrollment equal to or less than three thousand five hundred pupils shall contain, to the extent feasible, the same number of school districts as other tiers containing school districts with an actual enrollment equal to or less than three thousand five hundred pupils. (c) (b) (i) To support school districts with meeting the minimum teacher salary requirements under chapter 284, including the minimum teacher starting salary requirement of fifty thousand dollars ; and the minimum teacher salary requirement for full-time teachers with, as of July 1, 2025, at least twelve years of experience of sixty-two thousand dollars under chapter 284 ; and the minimum teacher salary requirement for teachers with at least twelve years of experience, who have had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who have returned to covered full-time employment with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256, of fifty thousand dollars, and other costs associated with such salary requirements, as identified in subparagraph subdivision (ii) including costs associated with the employerâs share of contributions to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system and the employerâs share of the tax imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions Act , the department of management shall calculate and assign to all school districts in a tier established under subparagraph division (b), a teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil in an amount based in part on the average cost to school districts within the tier to meet the requirements , plus an amount equal to the teacher salary supplement supplemental state aid amount for the budget year . (ii) If, however, a school districtâs total teacher salary supplement district cost under paragraph âcâ , as calculated using the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil assigned to the school districtâs applicable tier, is insufficient to comply with the applicable minimum teacher salary requirements of the school district, including costs associated with the employerâs share of contributions to the Iowa public employeesâ retirement system and the employerâs share of the tax imposed by the federal Insurance Contributions House File 787, p. 3 Act , the department of management shall set the school districtâs teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil at an amount necessary to meet the districtâs minimum salary requirements and associated costs. If, however, a school district reported a teacherâs years of experience incorrectly on the fall 2023 basic educational data survey compared to the fall 2024 basic educational data survey, and the difference would have resulted in an additional per pupil amount for the budget year beginning July 1, 2024, the department of management shall increase the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil for the budget year beginning July 1, 2025, by the difference between the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil that would have been calculated if not for the incorrect reporting and the teacher salary supplement district cost per pupil actually calculated. Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. DIVISION II TEACHER PREPARATION Sec. 3. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (1) (a) Require Except as described in subparagraph division (b), require that each student admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program participate in pre-student teaching field experiences that include both observation and participation in teaching activities in a variety of school settings. (a) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students participating in an initial teacher preparation program shall comprise a total of at least eighty hours in duration, at least ten hours of which shall occur prior to a studentâs acceptance in an approved practitioner preparation program. (b) Pre-student teaching field experiences for students participating in a teacher intern preparation program shall may comprise a total of at least fifty hours in duration. Sec. 4. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (a), subparagraph subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: (i) The If the student has prior work experience as a House File 787, p. 4 substitute teacher, the board of educational examiners has issued a substitute license , or substitute authorization , or a para-educator certificate to the student. Sec. 5. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph c, subparagraph (2), subparagraph division (b), subparagraph subdivision (i), Code 2025, is amended by striking the subparagraph subdivision. Sec. 6. Section 256.16, subsection 1, paragraph m, subparagraph (2), Code 2025, is amended by striking the subparagraph. DIVISION III OUT-OF-STATE PLACEMENT Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 282.35 Children requiring special education ââ out-of-state placement. 1. For purposes of this section: a. âChildâ means an individual who is under the age of eighteen years, or an individual who is under the age of twenty-one and is a full-time student, to whom all of the following criteria apply: (1) The individual is eligible for health care benefits under chapter 249A. (2) The individualâs health care coordination and intervention team determines, pursuant to section 249A.4A, subsection 3, paragraph âcâ , subparagraph (1), that the placement of the individual in an out-of-state facility, or placement of the individual with an out-of-state provider, is necessary for the individual to realize the full benefits of chapter 249A. (3) The director of the department of health and human services certifies that the placement of the individual in an out-of-state facility, or placement of the individual with an out-of-state provider, is necessary to prevent the filing of a petition under chapter 232 related to the individual. (4) The director of the department of education determines that the placement of the individual in an out-of-state facility, or placement of the individual with an out-of-state provider, would provide to the individual the education required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted pursuant to chapter 256B. House File 787, p. 5 (5) The individual is and remains a resident of this state. b. âDistrict of residenceâ means the school district in which the parent or legal guardian of the child resides or the district in which the district court is located if the district court is the guardian of the child. c. âResidentâ means the same as defined in section 282.1, subsection 2. 2. A childâs district of residence may place the child in an out-of-state facility or with an out-of-state provider for purposes of providing the child with the education required under chapter 256B, subject to the terms of an agreement between the childâs district of residence and the facility or provider. The agreement shall satisfy all of the following requirements: a. The agreement must require the facility or provider to provide periodic invoices to the childâs district of residence that describes the services provided to the child and the cost associated with such services. b. The agreement must condition the childâs district of residenceâs payment of the invoice described in paragraph âaâ upon the facility or provider providing to the child the education required under chapter 256B and the rules adopted pursuant to chapter 256B. 3. a. A childâs district of residence is not financially responsible for the services provided by an out-of-state facility or an out-of-state provider to a child unless the out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provides notice to the childâs district of residence that the child may be subject to this section and the childâs district of residence enters into an agreement with the out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider that satisfies the requirements established in subsection 2. b. By August 1 following the school year in which the out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into under subsection 2, the childâs district of residence may submit an accounting to the department of education that describes the cost of the services provided by the facility or provider during such school year. House File 787, p. 6 c. By August 15 following the school year in which the out-of-state facility or out-of-state provider provided services to a child pursuant to an agreement entered into under subsection 2, the department of education shall review and either approve or modify the accounting submitted pursuant to paragraph âbâ and make payment to the childâs district of residence toward the school year in which the cost of the services was incurred. The payment amount is the difference between the amount of the actual costs as reflected in the district of residenceâs accounting less the amount generated by the weighting for the provision of services. d. Any amounts paid by the department of education to school districts in this state pursuant to paragraph âcâ shall be deducted on a monthly basis from the state foundation aid paid under section 257.16 to all school districts in the state in the school year following the school year in which the services were provided. The portion of the total amount paid by the department of education to a district that shall be deducted from the state foundation aid paid to the district shall be the same as the ratio that the budget enrollment for the budget year of the district bears to the total budget enrollment in the state for that budget year. 4. The department of education shall promptly and summarily resolve any disputes between school districts related to the financial responsibility of such school districts under this section. DIVISION IV ONLINE STATE JOB POSTING SYSTEM Sec. 8. Section 84A.6, subsection 4, Code 2025, is amended by striking the subsection. Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 256.27 Online state job posting system. 1. The department shall provide for the operation of an online state job posting system. The system shall be designed and implemented for the online posting of job openings offered by school districts, charter schools, area education agencies, the department, and accredited nonpublic schools. The system shall be accessible via the departmentâs internet site. The system shall include a mechanism for the electronic submission House File 787, p. 7 of job openings for posting on the system as provided in subsection 2. The system and each job posting on the system shall include a statement that an employer submitting a job opening for posting on the system will comply with all applicable provisions of section 216.6. The department may contract for, or partner with another entity for, the use of an existing internet site to operate the online state job posting system if the existing internet site is more effective and economical than the departmentâs internet site. 2. A school district, charter school, or area education agency shall submit all of its job openings to the department for posting on the system and shall keep and maintain all unfilled job openings on the system. The department shall post all of its job openings on the system. An accredited nonpublic school may submit job openings to the department for posting on the system. 3. This section shall not be construed to do any of the following: a. Prohibit any employer from advertising job openings and recruiting employees independently of the system. b. Prohibit any employer from using another method of advertising job openings or another applicant tracking system in addition to the system. c. Provide the department with any regulatory authority in the hiring process or hiring decisions of any employer other than the department. DIVISION V TEACHER COMPENSATION Sec. 10. Section 284.15, subsection 3, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, the salary for a career teacher, model teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, who holds a valid license issued under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3 , and who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, shall be at least sixty-two thousand dollars. (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a career teacher, model teacher, mentor teacher, or lead teacher, House File 787, p. 8 who holds a valid license issued under chapter 256, subchapter VII, part 3, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who has returned to covered full-time employment with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256, shall be paid not less than fifty thousand dollars. Sec. 11. Section 284.16, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a career teacher, instructional coach, curriculum and professional development leader, or model teacher, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, shall be paid not less than sixty-two thousand dollars. (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a career teacher, instructional coach, curriculum and professional development leader, or model teacher, who has been a teacher for at least twelve years, who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who has returned to covered full-time employment with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256, shall be paid not less than fifty thousand dollars. Sec. 12. Section 284.17, subsection 1, paragraph b, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: b. (1) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, the minimum salary of fifty thousand dollars for a full-time teacher who has less than twelve years of teaching experience and a minimum salary of sixty-two thousand dollars for a full-time teacher who has at least twelve years of teaching experience. (2) Notwithstanding subparagraph (1), for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025, and each subsequent fiscal year, a minimum salary of fifty thousand dollars for a full-time teacher who has at least twelve years of teaching experience, who has had a bona fide retirement from employment with a covered employer as provided in section 97B.52A, and who House File 787, p. 9 has returned to covered full-time employment with a covered employer pursuant to chapter 97B as a teacher licensed under chapter 256. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 787, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor